Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1407.06
Special permit for sale at other than established place of business; rules and regulations; fee.

The board may adopt rules and regulations establishing procedures for the issuance of such special permits. The fee for each such special permit shall be not more than the same fee as established for a dealer's license pursuant to section 60-1411.01.

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 19;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 7.